Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Alaska Housing Finance Corporation.

Sec. 18.56.010.
Findings and purpose.

There exists within the state a serious shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary residential housing available at low or moderate prices or rentals to persons of lower and moderate income. There also exist within the state remote, underdeveloped, or blighted areas where the development of decent, safe, and sanitary housing is necessary to economic growth. These conditions are inimical to the safety, health, welfare, and prosperity of the residents of the state and to the sound growth of urban and rural communities.

The legislature finds and declares that private enterprise has not been able to provide, without assistance, an adequate supply of safe and sanitary homes at prices or rents that persons of lower or moderate income can afford, or to achieve rehabilitation of much of the present housing for persons of lower and moderate income, or to provide without assistance the housing necessary to promote the economic growth of remote, underdeveloped, or blighted areas, and that existing state and federal programs are inadequate to meet housing needs of persons of lower and moderate income or of remote, underdeveloped, or blighted areas. It is imperative that the supply of housing for persons of lower and moderate income and the housing necessary to promote the economic growth of remote, underdeveloped, or blighted areas be increased and that coordination and cooperation among private enterprise, state and local government be encouraged to sponsor, build, and rehabilitate residential housing for these persons.

The legislature finds and declares further that, in accomplishing this purpose, the creation of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation is essential to assist in the acquisition and development of land and the construction, rehabilitation, financing, management, maintenance, sale, and rental of dwelling units for persons of lower and moderate income or persons in remote, underdeveloped, or blighted areas and that these activities serve a public purpose in benefiting the people of the state. The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation is empowered to act on behalf of the state and its people in serving this public purpose for the benefit of the general public.

The program of making loans for residential housing to veterans in accordance with AS 26.15 has increased and improved the supply of adequate housing in the state, and the continuation of the program is essential to the economic growth of the state and the expansion of the supply of adequate residential housing in the state. Participation by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation in the program of purchasing and insuring state veterans’ loans as provided in this chapter will be of material aid in insuring the continuance of the program of making loans for residential housing to veterans in accordance with AS 26.15.

Expansion of the program of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation of purchasing insured and uninsured mortgage loans is essential to the economic growth of the state and the supply of adequate residential housing in the state.

The legislature finds that enabling the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation to assist in financing the program of veterans’ loans for residential housing in accordance with AS 26.15 and to expand its program of purchasing other mortgage loans serves a public purpose in benefiting the people of the state. The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation is empowered to act on behalf of the state and its people in serving this public purpose for the benefit of the general public.

The legislature finds that permitting the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation to create a subsidiary to assist in the financing of prepayment of all or a portion of a governmental employer’s share of unfunded accrued actuarial liability of retirement systems serves a public purpose in benefiting the people of the state. The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation may act on behalf of the state and its people in serving this public purpose for the benefit of the general public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 151 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Sec. 18.56.020.
Alaska Housing Finance Corporation.

The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation is a public corporation and government instrumentality within the Department of Revenue, but having a legal existence independent of and separate from the state.
The corporation may not be terminated as long as it has bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding.
Upon termination of the corporation, its rights and property pass to the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 78 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent relating to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, see § 10, ch. 106, SLA 1980, in the 1980 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.56.030.
Corporation governing body.

The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of

the commissioner of revenue;

the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

the commissioner of health and social services; and

four public members appointed by the governor, as follows:

one member with expertise or experience in finances or real estate;

one member who is a rural resident of the state or who has expertise or experience with a regional housing authority;

one member who has expertise or experience in residential energy efficient home-building or weatherization; and

one person who has expertise or experience in the provision of senior or low-income housing.

If a member described in (a)(1), (2), or (3) of this section is unable to attend a meeting of the board the member may by an instrument in writing filed with the board, designate a deputy or assistant to act in the member’s place at the meeting. For all purposes of this chapter, the designee is a member of the board at the meeting.

The board members described in (a)(4) of this section serve two-year terms.

If a vacancy occurs on the board, the governor shall make an appointment, effective immediately, for the unexpired portion of the term.

The members of the board described in (a)(4) of this section receive $100 compensation for each day spent on official business of the corporation and may be reimbursed by the corporation for actual and necessary expenses at the same rate paid to members of state boards under AS

39.20.180

.

The governor shall appoint the members under (a)(4) of this section to give the board of directors a reasonable geographic balance among regions of the state. The members of the board appointed under (a)(4) of this section shall have recognized competence and wide experience in housing, finance, or other business management-related fields.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 5 ch 151 SLA 1975; am § 79 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 167 SLA 1978; am § 13 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 32 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1990; am §§ 82 — 86 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in paragraph (a)(2) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was substituted for “commissioner of community and regional affairs” in accordance with § 91(a)(4), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in paragraph (a)(2) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For provisions applicable to the terms of the public members serving on the board of directors on July 1, 1992, and the manner of appointment of their successors, see § 145, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.56.040.
Meetings of board.

The board shall elect a chairman from among its membership at its annual meeting each year. A majority of the members constitute a quorum for organizing the board, conducting its business, and exercising the powers of the corporation. The board shall meet at the call of its chairman. The board shall meet not less than once each three months.

The board may meet and transact business by electronic media if

public notice of the time and locations where the meeting will be held by electronic media has been given in the same manner as if the meeting were held in a single location;

participants and members of the public in attendance can hear and have the same right to participate in the meeting as if the meeting were conducted in person; and

copies of pertinent reference materials, statutes, regulations, and audio-visual materials are reasonably available to participants and to the public.

A meeting by electronic media as provided in this section has the same legal effect as a meeting in person.

For the purposes of this chapter public notice of 24 hours or more is adequate notice of a meeting of the board at which the issuance of corporation bonds is authorized.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 15 ch 113 SLA 1982)

Sec. 18.56.045.
Minutes of meetings.

The board shall keep minutes of each meeting and send a certified copy to the governor and to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 115 SLA 1981)

Sec. 18.56.050.
Administration of affairs.

The board shall manage the assets and business of the corporation and may adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws and regulations governing the manner in which the business of the corporation is conducted and the manner in which its powers are exercised.
The board shall delegate supervision of the administration of the corporation to the executive director, appointed in accordance with AS

18.56.052

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 167 SLA 1978; am § 15 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Sec. 18.56.052.
Executive director.

The corporation shall employ an executive director, who may not be a member of the board. The executive director shall be appointed by the board and serves at the pleasure of the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 167 SLA 1978)

Sec. 18.56.055.
Legal advisor.

The attorney general is the legal counsel for the corporation. The attorney general shall advise the corporation in legal matters and represent it in suits.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971)

Sec. 18.56.060.
Employment of personnel.

The board may appoint other officers and engage professional and technical advisors as independent contractors.
The executive director may hire employees of the corporation and, subject to the approval of the board, engage professional and technical advisors under contract with the corporation.
The board shall prescribe the duties and compensation of corporation personnel, including the executive director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 167 SLA 1978; am § 16 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Sec. 18.56.070.
Personnel exempt from state Personnel Act.

The personnel of the corporation are exempt from AS 39.25.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 17 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Sec. 18.56.080.
Interdepartmental cooperation.

All departments, agencies, and public corporations of the state may provide information, services, facilities, and loans to the corporation upon its request.
The corporation shall, upon request, reimburse departments, agencies, and public corporations of the state for services or facilities provided, loans advanced, or expenses incurred on the corporation’s behalf at the request of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 18 ch 106 SLA 1980)

Sec. 18.56.082.
Alaska housing finance revolving fund.

The Alaska housing finance revolving fund is established in the corporation.
The revolving fund consists of appropriations made to the revolving fund by the legislature, money or other assets transferred to the revolving fund by the corporation, and unrestricted repayments of principal on loans made or purchased by the corporation.
Amounts deposited in the revolving fund shall be expended for the purposes of the corporation, set out in this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 102 SLA 1983)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The unexpended and unobligated balance of an appropriation to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation revolving fund may be appropriated for purposes unrelated to the corporation.
April 24, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.56.083.
Bonds for senior housing. [Repealed, § 140 ch 4 FSSLA 1992. For current law, see AS 18.56.790.]

Sec. 18.56.084.
International borrowing.

For the purpose of obtaining access to international capital markets to borrow money for the special mortgage loan purchase program under AS

18.56.098

, as an addition to the powers of the corporation under AS

18.56.090

, the corporation may (1) establish, or cause to be established, subsidiary corporations incorporated in the state or in another state, or under the laws of a foreign jurisdiction; (2) invest in corporations established under this section; (3) issue bonds and borrow money for investments in corporations established under this section; (4) borrow from corporations established under this section; (5) guarantee the obligations of corporations established under this section; or (6) enter into agreements with corporations established under this section or with other persons. In exercising a power under this section, the corporation may not subject its assets to risk of loss through foreign currency exchange. A guarantee under this section constitutes a bond of the corporation as defined in AS

18.56.390

.

History.

(§ 16 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 87 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.085.
Investment of state surplus.
[Repealed, § 77 ch 106 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 18.56.086.
Creation of subsidiaries.

The corporation may create subsidiary corporations for the purpose of financing or facilitating the financing of school construction, facilities for the University of Alaska, facilities for ports and harbors, the acquisition, development, management, or operation of affordable housing, prepayment of all or a portion of a governmental employer’s share of unfunded accrued actuarial liability of retirement systems, or other capital projects. A subsidiary corporation created under this section may be incorporated under AS

10.20.146

—

10.20.166

. The corporation may transfer assets of the corporation to a subsidiary created under this section. A subsidiary created under this section may borrow money and issue bonds as evidence of that borrowing, and has all the powers of the corporation that the corporation grants to it. However, a subsidiary created for the purpose of financing or facilitating the financing of prepayment of a governmental employer’s share of unfunded accrued actuarial liability of retirement systems may borrow money and issue bonds only after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under (b) of this section, if the state bond rating is the equivalent of AA- or better , and subject to AS

37.15.903

. Unless otherwise provided by the corporation, the debts, liabilities, and obligations of a subsidiary corporation created under this section are not the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation.

Before the issuance of bonds under this section, the subsidiary corporation shall submit a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee for review, and 45 days shall elapse before bonds are issued, unless the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee earlier recommends that the subsidiary corporation proceed with the issuance. Should the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee recommend within the 45-day period that the subsidiary corporation not proceed with the issuance of bonds, the subsidiary corporation shall again review the proposal, and, if the subsidiary corporation decides to issue the bonds, the subsidiary corporation shall provide the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee with a statement of the subsidiary corporation’s reasons for doing so before issuance under this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 130 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 35 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 7 SLA 2010; am § 5 ch 7 SLA 2011; am § 2 ch 11 SLA 2013; am §§ 1, 2 ch 109 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For sale to AHFC of right to receive revenue from the settlement of

Alaska v. Philip Morris, Inc.

, No. 1JU-97-915 Civ. (First Jud. Dist. at Juneau), and special bonding provisions for AHFC or a subsidiary created under this section, see §§ 9 and 10,
ch. 130, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts, § 3,
ch. 96, SLA 2001 in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts, and §§ 1 and 2,
ch. 35, SLA 2006 in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

For findings, intent, and transitional provisions relating to the transition of the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation from a subsidiary of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation to an independent public corporation of the state, see secs. 1 and 25, ch. 11, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For current law relating to the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation, see AS 31.25.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective December 26, 2018, in (a), in the fifth sentence, inserted “after submitting a proposal to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under (b) of this section,” following “issue bonds only” and made a stylistic change; added (b).

Sec. 18.56.088.
Administrative procedure; regulations.

Except for AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act), AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) does not apply to this chapter. The corporation shall make available to members of the public copies of the regulations adopted under (b) — (e) of this section.

The board may adopt regulations by motion or by resolution or in any other manner permitted by its bylaws.

The board may adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and shall adopt regulations necessary for the following purposes:

determination of borrower eligibility including, but not limited to, income limitations and the determination of remote, underdeveloped, or blighted areas of the state;

loan guidelines and terms including but not limited to maximum loan amounts and required loan-to-value ratios, but excluding mortgage loan interest rates;

characteristics of housing eligible for loans or purchase of loans, including compliance with the requirements of AS

18.56.300

;

the qualifications of loan originators and servicers and the method of allocating amounts available for the purchase of loans;

establishment of a procedure, including a fee schedule, for the commitment for one year or less of money for the purchase of an individual mortgage loan at a specific interest rate; and

establishment of the program of housing assistance authorized by AS

18.56.090(b)

including program regulations that, at minimum,

establish priorities and criteria for providing money and other forms of authorized assistance in response to housing assistance proposals;

define the forms of housing assistance authorized under AS

18.56.090(b)

;

set out procedures to evaluate housing assistance proposals;

set out procedures to approve the award of housing assistance; and

prescribe methods of monitoring the use of money paid out under AS 18.56.090(b) and the progress of activity under the approved housing assistance program.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, at least 15 days before the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation on a subject specified in (c)(1) — (4) of this section, the board shall give public notice of the proposed action by publishing the notice in at least three newspapers of general circulation in the state and by mailing a copy of the notice to every person who has filed a request for notice of proposed regulations with the board or the corporation. The public notice must include a statement of the time, place, and nature of the proceedings for the adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation and must include an informative summary of the proposed subject of the regulation. On the date and at the time and place designated in the notice, the board shall give each interested person or an authorized representative, or both, the opportunity to present statements, arguments, or contentions in writing, and shall give members of the public an opportunity to present oral statements, arguments, or contentions for a total period of at least one hour. The board shall consider all relevant matter presented to it before adopting, amending, or repealing a regulation. At a hearing under this subsection, the board may continue or postpone the hearing to a time and place that it determines. A regulation that is adopted, or its amendment or repeal, may vary in content from the informative summary specified in this subsection if the subject matter of the regulation, or its amendment or repeal, remains the same and the original notice was written so as to assure that members of the public are reasonably notified of the proposed subject of the board’s action in order for them to determine whether their interests could be affected by the board’s action on that subject.

A regulation or order of repeal on a subject specified in (c) of this section may be adopted as an emergency regulation or order of repeal if the board makes a finding in its order of adoption or repeal, including a statement of the facts that constitute the emergency, that the adoption of the regulation or order of repeal is necessary for the immediate preservation of the orderly operation of the corporation’s loan and bonding programs. The requirements of (d) of this section do not apply to the initial adoption of an emergency regulation covering a subject specified in (c)(1) — (4) of this section; however, upon adoption of an emergency regulation, the board shall, within 10 days after adoption, give notice of the adoption in accordance with (d) of this section. An emergency regulation adopted under this subsection does not remain in effect more than 120 days unless the board complies with (d) of this section during the 120-day period.

A regulation adopted under (b) — (e) of this section becomes effective immediately upon its adoption by the board, unless otherwise specifically provided by the order of adoption.

The provisions of (b) — (e) of this section do not apply to regulations governing interest rates on the corporation’s mortgage loan programs.

The board shall adopt regulations in accordance with (a) — (f) of this section that establish a procedure by which a seller of mortgage loans may appeal a decision of the corporation not to purchase mortgage loans offered by the seller.

The board may adopt regulations under (a) — (f) of this section that establish conditions and terms for mobile home loans that are not in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, including conditions and terms relating to owner-occupancy, the number of loans that may be made to a single borrower, and borrower eligibility requirements, if the board first determines that the regulations are necessary to ensure the continued security of the mobile home loan portfolio.

History.

(§ 5 ch 167 SLA 1978; am § 19 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 17 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 128 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1990; am § 88 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 164 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

and

44.62.312

, regarding public meetings” in accordance with § 29(5), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Cross references. —

Notwithstanding this section, AS

36.30.015(f)

requires the board of directors of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation to adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to govern the procurement of supplies, services, professional services, and construction for the corporation and board.

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 15 AAC 150, art. 2.

For disposition of assets, see 15 AAC 150, art. 4.

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

For definitions, see 15 AAC 150, art. 6.

For special mortgage loan program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 1.

For qualified mortgage bonds, see 15 AAC 151, art. 2.

For veterans’ mortgage program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 3.

For senior housing program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 5.

For multi-family, special needs, and congregate housing program, see 15 AAC 151, art. 6.

For low-income housing tax credit, see 15 AAC 151, art. 8.

For housing assistance loan fund, see 15 AAC 152, art. 1.

For home ownership assistance program, see 15 AAC 152, art. 2.

For federally guaranteed and insured rural housing loan programs, see 15 AAC 152, art. 3.

For provisions applicable to all grant programs, see 15 AAC 154, art. 1.

For senior citizens housing development grants, see 15 AAC 154, art. 2.

For multifamily affordable housing development grant, see 15 AAC 154, art. 3.

For supplemental housing development grants, see 15 AAC 154, art. 4.

For homeless assistance grants, see 15 AAC 154, art. 5.

For grant management, see 15 AAC 154, art. 7.

For other grant programs, see 15 AAC 154, art. 9.

For building energy efficiency standard, see 15 AAC 155, art. 1.

For home energy loan subsidy grant, see 15 AAC 155, art. 2.

For home energy rating rebate grant, see 15 AAC 155, art. 3.

For home energy conservation and weatherization program, see 15 AAC 155, art. 4.

For energy rated homes of Alaska, see 15 AAC 155, art. 5.

For definitions, see 15 AAC 155, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (a), deleted the second sentence, which read, “Within 45 days after adoption, the chairman of the board shall submit a regulation adopted under (b) – (e ) of this section to the chairman of the administrative regulation review committee under AS

24.20.400

– 24.20.460.”

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent as to mobile home financing, see 1984 Senate Journal at p. 3357.

Sec. 18.56.089.
Compliance with Executive Budget Act; corporation finances; dividend.

The provisions of AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act)

apply to

the operating budget of the corporation;

amounts payable from corporate earnings or assets of the corporation for grants or grant programs authorized by this chapter;

interest rate subsidies and building subsidies as determined by the corporation;

the amount and source or sources of the total annual appropriation for the corporation’s loan programs for which a subsidy is not provided, but the provisions of AS 37.07 are not otherwise applicable to that appropriation;

the amount and source or sources of the total annual appropriation for the corporation’s multi-family housing loans and the corporation’s housing programs and housing projects if a subsidy is provided from the corporation’s arbitrage earnings for the loans, programs, or projects, but the provisions of AS 37.07 are not otherwise applicable to that appropriation; and

except as otherwise specifically provided in (2) of this subsection, the activities of the corporation under AS 18.55 and the activities of the corporation under this chapter;

do not apply to activities of the corporation under AS 18.55 and this chapter that

relate to the corporation’s borrowing of money as provided in this chapter to make or purchase mortgage loans, including the issuing of its obligations or evidence of that borrowing and the repayment of the debt obligation;

relate to the corporation’s ability to refinance existing mortgage loans in order to achieve a lower interest rate; or

are directly attributable to the servicing of mortgage loans, including real estate acquired by the corporation as a result of foreclosure.

To further ensure effective budgetary decision making by the legislature, the corporation shall

annually review the corporation’s assets, including the assets of the Alaska housing finance revolving fund under AS

18.56.082

, to determine whether assets of the corporation exceed an amount required to fulfill the purposes of the corporation as defined in AS 18.55 and this chapter; in making its review, the board shall determine whether, and to what extent, assets in excess of the amount required to fulfill the purposes of the corporation during the next fiscal year are available without

breaching any agreement entered into by the corporation;

materially impairing the operations or financial integrity of the corporation; or

materially affecting the ability of the corporation to

stabilize the market price of and demand for residential housing; and

ensure an adequate long-term supply of residential housing for persons of lower and moderate income;

specifically identify in the corporation’s assets the amounts that the corporation believes are necessary to meet the requirements of (1)(C) of this subsection; and

present to the legislature by January 10 of each year a complete accounting of all assets of the corporation, including assets of the Alaska housing finance revolving fund under AS

18.56.082

, and a report of the review and determination made under (1) and (2) of this subsection; the accounting shall be audited by an independent outside auditor and must include a full description of all mortgage loan interest and principal repayments and program receipts, including

mortgage loan commitment fees received by or accrued to the corporation during the preceding fiscal year; and

all income earned on assets of the corporation during that period, including earnings on assets of the state assisted mortgage fund.

The corporation shall make a dividend available to the state each fiscal year. The corporation shall pay the dividend for a current fiscal year to the state before the end of that fiscal year. The legislature may appropriate the dividend for capital projects. The corporation shall notify the commissioner of revenue of the amount of each dividend under this subsection for inclusion in the state operating budget and shall also notify the commissioner when each dividend is available for payment to the state. The amount of the dividend for a current fiscal year is calculated as follows:

the lesser of $103,000,000 or 75 percent of the adjusted change in net assets of the corporation for the base fiscal year;

minus the amount of money from the corporation used during that current fiscal year for bond repayment and other costs related to the bonds issued under

ch. 26, SLA 1996, up to a maximum of $1,000,000;

sec. 10(b), ch. 130, SLA 2000;

sec. 1, ch. 1, SSSLA 2002;

sec. 4, ch. 120, SLA 2004; and

minus any appropriation of unrestricted unencumbered money of the corporation during the current fiscal year, other than an appropriation for the corporation’s operating budget.

In (c) of this section,

“adjusted change in net assets” means the change in net assets from the base fiscal year, adjusted for capital expenditures incurred during the base fiscal year and temporary market value adjustments to assets and liabilities made during the base fiscal year;

“base fiscal year” means the fiscal year ending two years before the end of the current fiscal year in which the dividend is made available to the state;

“dividend” means a payment made to the state under (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 20 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 102 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 1991; am §§ 89 — 91 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 120 SLA 2004; am §§ 2, 3, 5 ch 7 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In (d) of this section, paragraph (1) was enacted as paragraph (4) and renumbered in 2006 to maintain the alphabetical order of the terms defined; at that time, former paragraph (3) was deleted and paragraphs (d)(1) and (2) were renumbered as (d)(2) and (3), respectively.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent applicable to the 2004 amendment of (c) of this section, see Sec. 1, ch. 120, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 120, SLA 2004 (SB 279), amending (c) of this section and providing for issuance of Alaska Housing Finance Corporation revenue bonds to finance water and sewer projects, see 2004 Senate Journal 1995 — 1996.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 7, SLA 2006 (SB 236), relating to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation and the determination of its dividend, see 2006 Senate Journal 1900 — 1901.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 35, SLA 2010 (Senate Bill 270), relating to the corporation’s determination of the dividend payable under this section, see 2010 Senate Journal 1475.